src/fst/lexicon.tmp.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

!! POS
+V      ! Verb
+N      ! Noun
+Adj    ! Adjective
+Adv    ! Adverb
+Pre    ! Preposition
+Pro    ! Pronoun
+Cnj    ! Conjunction
+Pcl    ! Particle
+Lig    ! Ligature

!!! Verb
! Aspect
@U.Asp.Comp@
@U.Asp.Cont@
@U.Asp.Prog@
@U.Asp.Imp@
@U.Asp.Rcmp@
@U.Asp.Inf@
+Cmp
+Ctm
+Prg
+Rcm
+Inf

! Trigger
+Act1 +Act2 +Act3 +Act4
+Obj1 +Obj2 +Obj3
+Loc
+Ben
+Ins
+Rsn
+Dir
+Rcp

! Mood
+Ind
+Dis
+Soc
+Pot

!!! Case particle inflections
+Comm +Prop       ! Common or proper nouns
+Sg +Pl         ! Person
+Dir +Idr +Obl  ! Case
!! Verb conjugations

LEXICON VerbPrefix
@U.Asp.Comp@:@U.Asp.Comp@nag V ;
!@U.Asp.Cont@
!@U.Asp.Prog@
@U.Asp.Imp@:@U.Asp.Imp@mag V ;
!@U.Asp.Rcmp@
@U.Asp.Inf@ V ;LEXICON V
! MAG- verbs
 aral           Vsuff "study" ;
 basa           Vsuff  "read" ;
 salita         Vsuff  "talk or speak" ;
 sulat          Vsuff  "write" ;
 saulo          Vsuff  "memorize" ;

!! MA- verbs
! kinig          VerbPrefix-Ma   "listen" ;
! nood           VerbPrefix-Ma   "watch" ;
! tulog          VerbPrefix-Ma   "sleep" ;
! ligo           VerbPrefix-Ma   "bathe" ;
! pasyol         VerbPrefix-Ma   "stroll" ;

LEXICON Vsuff! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2020 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Punctuation symbols

LEXICON Punctuation   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains the list
!! of punctuation symbols:
!! * Symbols like .,: are tagged with __+CLB__
!! * other symbols like +.& are tagged with __+PUNCT__, and
!! * paired symbols like ()«» are tagged with __+PUNCT+LEFT__
!!   and __+PUNCT+RIGHT__, respectively.

!! * Clause boundary symbols:
          ,+CLB:,     PunctEnd ;
          .+CLB:.     PunctEnd ;
         ..+CLB:..    PunctEnd ;
        ...+CLB:...   PunctEnd ;
         %:+CLB:%:    PunctEnd ;
         %;+CLB:%;    PunctEnd ;
         %!+CLB:%!    PunctEnd ;
          |+CLB:|     PunctEnd ;
          ?+CLB:?     PunctEnd ; ! Question mark
          …+CLB:…     PunctEnd ;
 …+CLB+Err/Orth:....  PunctEnd ; ! Four and five full stops are analysed as
 …+CLB+Err/Orth:..... PunctEnd ; ! misspellings of the ellipsis sign.
          ¿+CLB:¿     PunctEnd ; ! Only seen as noise.
          ¶+CLB:¶     PunctEnd ; ! This sign is for titles, it is introduced by the
                                 ! catxml script, and may be changed if it inter-
                                 ! feres with real pilcrow signs.
          ❡+CLB:❡     PunctEnd ; ! This sign is for titles on html pages, added
                                 ! when jorgal apertium download pages for MT
          ¬+CLB:¬     PunctEnd ;
          ¥+CLB:¥     PunctEnd ; ! foreløpig

!! * Single punctuation marks

    •+PUNCT:•    PunctEnd ;
    ●+PUNCT:●    PunctEnd ;
    ·+PUNCT:·    PunctEnd ;
!    ּ+PUNCT:ּ     PunctEnd ;
    ·+PUNCT:·    PunctEnd ;
    -+PUNCT:∑-   PunctEnd ; ! hyphen
   --+PUNCT:∑-∑- PunctEnd ; ! double hyphen
    –+PUNCT:–    PunctEnd ; ! endash
    —+PUNCT:—    PunctEnd ; ! emdash
    ―+PUNCT:―    PunctEnd ; ! horizontal bar
    −+PUNCT:−    PunctEnd ;
    _+PUNCT:_    PunctEnd ;
    =+PUNCT:=    PunctEnd ;
    ≈+PUNCT:≈    PunctEnd ;
    &+PUNCT:&    PunctEnd ;
   %"+PUNCT:%"   PunctEnd ;
    '+PUNCT:'    PunctEnd ;
    *+PUNCT:*    PunctEnd ;
    ++PUNCT:+    PunctEnd ;
    ±+PUNCT:±    PunctEnd ;
    `+PUNCT:`    PunctEnd ;
    ´+PUNCT:´    PunctEnd ;
    /+PUNCT:/    PunctEnd ;
  +/-+PUNCT:+/∑- PunctEnd ;
    ~+PUNCT:~    PunctEnd ;
    ‐+PUNCT:‐    PunctEnd ;
    °+PUNCT:°    PunctEnd ;

!! * Paired punctuation marks

  «+PUNCT+LEFT:«7     PunctEnd ;
 »+PUNCT+RIGHT:»7     PunctEnd ;
  “+PUNCT+LEFT:“      PunctEnd ;
 ”+PUNCT+RIGHT:”      PunctEnd ;
  ‘+PUNCT+LEFT:‘      PunctEnd ;
 ’+PUNCT+RIGHT:’      PunctEnd ;
  „+PUNCT+LEFT:„      PunctEnd ;
  ‹+PUNCT+LEFT:‹      PunctEnd ;
 ›+PUNCT+RIGHT:›      PunctEnd ;
  (+PUNCT+LEFT:(      PunctEnd ;
 )+PUNCT+RIGHT:)      PunctEnd ;
  [+PUNCT+LEFT:[      PunctEnd ;
 ]+PUNCT+RIGHT:]      PunctEnd ;
  {+PUNCT+LEFT:{      PunctEnd ;
 }+PUNCT+RIGHT:}      PunctEnd ;
 %<+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%<%] PunctEnd ;
 %>+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%>%] PunctEnd ;


! Todo: Some symbols from non-ISO code pages do not work

!+PUNCT:"\150" PunctEnd ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
!+PUNCT:"\151" PunctEnd ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
! Did not work.

LEXICON PunctEnd   !!= * __@CODE@__ leads to # only.
    # ;
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Symbols
!! Symbols are single character special signs typically denoting whole nouns. They are different from
!! abbreviations and acronyms by not consisting of regular, alphabetic letters.

!! Symbols are syntactic constituents, and thus part of the sentence analysis. That is, they are
!! different from punctuation: punctuation express syntactic boundaries of various kinds, symbols
!! are syntactic constituents.
